Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202044-9215
Escrow account.

A public adjuster who receives, accepts, or holds, on behalf of an insured, any funds toward the settlement of a claim for loss or damage shall deposit the funds in a non-interest-bearing escrow account in a financial institution that is insured by an agency of the federal government in the home state of such public adjuster or the state where the loss occurred.

Laws 2018, LB743, § 15.